Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2836
Pharmacy technician, defined.

Pharmacy technician means an individual registered under sections 38-2890 to 38-2897.

Laws 2007, LB247, § 80;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 932.